Utah statutes.
20A-11-1103.   False statements in relation to candidates forbidden.
A person may not knowingly make or publish, or cause to be made or published,
any false statement in relation to any candidate, proposed constitutional
amendment, or other measure, that is intended or tends to affect any voting at
any primary, convention, or election.
